Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3838
(UTC 412) Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

(UTC 412) (a) The court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification must be made in accordance with the settlor's probable intention.

(b) The court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust's administration.

(c) Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 38.

If a trustee knows or should know of circumstances that justify judicial action to modify an administrative or distributive provision of a trust because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, the trustee has a duty to petition the court for appropriate modification of, or deviation from, the terms of the trust. The possible imposition of such a duty on a trustee further supports permitting a trustee to seek modification under this section even in those instances where a trust may have terminated or expired by its own terms, but the winding up and distribution of trust property is still pending. In re Trust Created by Augustin, 27 Neb. App. 593, 935 N.W.2d 493 (2019).

This section broadens the court's ability to apply equitable deviation to modify a trust. The application of equitable deviation allows a court to modify the dispositive provisions of a trust, as well as its administrative terms. The purpose of equitable deviation is not to disregard the settlor's intent but to modify inopportune details to effectuate better the settlor's broader purpose. In re Trust Created by Augustin, 27 Neb. App. 593, 935 N.W.2d 493 (2019).